Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB729.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 6063YC (5) 91 dg/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 135C.34, Code 2026, is amended to read 1 as follows: 2 135C.34 Medication aide ââ certification. 3 1. The department of inspections, appeals, and licensing , 4 in cooperation with other appropriate agencies, shall establish 5 a procedure to allow a person who is certified as a medication 6 aide in another state to become certified in this state upon 7 completion and passage of both the certified nurse aide and 8 certified medication aide challenge examinations examination , 9 without additional requirements for certification, including 10 but not limited to, required employment in this state prior to 11 certification. 12 2. a. The department shall establish a medication aide 13 certification registry on the departmentâs internet site. The 14 medication aide certification registry shall allow a person 15 offering a department-approved medication aide certification 16 examination to submit proof that an individual successfully 17 completed the department-approved medication aide certification 18 examination. 19 b. The department shall not charge a fee for a person 20 to submit or access proof that an individual successfully 21 completed a department-approved medication aide certification 22 examination. 23 3. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 24 to administer this section . 25 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 135C.34A Medication aides ââ rules. 26 The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 27 17A governing properly trained persons charged with the 28 responsibility of administering medications or a class of 29 medications at residential care facilities, nursing facilities, 30 residential care facilities with three-bed to five-bed 31 specialized licenses, intermediate care facilities for the 32 intellectually disabled, and intermediate care facilities for 33 persons with mental illness, as applicable: 34 1. A rule authorizing a department-approved medication 35 -1- LSB 6063YC (5) 91 dg/ko 1/ 4 H.F. _____ aide challenge examination to be administered by an 1 area community college shall also authorize other 2 department-approved competency evaluation programs to 3 administer a department-approved medication aide challenge 4 examination. 5 2. A rule which states that before an individual may take a 6 department-approved medication aide challenge examination in 7 place of taking a medication aide course, the individual must 8 provide to the community college a specified written statement, 9 and also state that other department-approved competency 10 evaluation programs can receive the statement. 11 3. A rule authorizing an individual who has written 12 documentation of certification as a medication aide in another 13 state to become a medication aide in Iowa shall not include 14 successful completion of a department-approved nurse aide 15 competency examination as a requirement for doing so. 16 4. Any rules necessary to ensure consistency in all 17 provisions relating to certified medication aide training and 18 qualifications. 19 Sec. 3. ADMINISTRATIVE RULES. 20 1. Rescission of administrative rules. 21 a. The following Iowa administrative rules are rescinded as 22 of July 1, 2026: 23 (1) 481 Iowa administrative code, rule 57.19, subrule 3, 24 paragraph âdâ. 25 (2) 481 Iowa administrative code, rule 57.19, subrule 3, 26 paragraph âfâ, second sentence. 27 (3) 481 Iowa administrative code, rule 58.21, subrule 6, 28 paragraph âcâ. 29 (4) 481 Iowa administrative code, rule 58.21, subrule 6, 30 paragraph âdâ, subparagraph (4). 31 (5) 481 Iowa administrative code, rule 58.21, subrule 6, 32 paragraph âeâ, unnumbered paragraph 2. 33 (6) 481 Iowa administrative code, rule 63.16, subrule 3, 34 paragraph âdâ. 35 -2- LSB 6063YC (5) 91 dg/ko 2/ 4 H.F. _____ (7) 481 Iowa administrative code, rule 63.16, subrule 3, 1 paragraph âfâ, second sentence. 2 (8) 481 Iowa administrative code, rule 64.4, subrule 9, 3 paragraph âcâ, subparagraph (4). 4 (9) 481 Iowa administrative code, rule 65.17, subrule 1, 5 paragraph âcâ. 6 (10) 481 Iowa administrative code, rule 65.17, subrule 1, 7 paragraph âdâ, subparagraph (4). 8 (11) 481 Iowa administrative code, rule 65.17, subrule 1, 9 paragraph âeâ, unnumbered paragraph 2. 10 b. As soon as practicable after July 1, 2026, the Iowa 11 administrative code editor shall remove the language of the 12 Iowa administrative rules referenced in paragraph âaâ from the 13 Iowa administrative code. 14 2. Conforming changes to rules. The department of 15 inspections, appeals, and licensing shall engage in rulemaking 16 pursuant to chapter 17A to make any conforming changes to rules 17 necessary to implement this Act. 18